Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-925
Municipal plan; planning commission; authorized.

Any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village is hereby authorized and empowered to make, adopt, amend, extend, and carry out a municipal plan as provided in sections 19-925 to 19-933 and to create by ordinance a planning commission with the powers and duties set forth in such sections. The planning commission of a city shall be designated the city planning commission or city plan commission, and the planning commission of a village shall be designated the village planning commission or village plan commission.

Laws 1937, c. 39, § 2, p. 176;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2102;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1302;

Laws 1993, LB 207, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 91.